Maryland, session 2025, HB1147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
7–208.
(A) The Commission shall:
(1) maintain a record of its actions;
(2) make an annual report to the Governor of its work; and
(3) make appropriate recommendations for the improvement of its
functions.
(B) THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION, DISAGGREGATED BY
RACE OF THE RELEVANT INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS:
(1) THE NUMBER OF CASES IN WHICH THE COMMISSION GRANTED
PAROLE;
(2) THE NUMBER OF CASES IN WHICH THE COMMISSION DENIED
PAROLE AND THE REASON FOR EACH DENIAL;
(3) THE NUMBER OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO WERE
GRANTED ADMINISTRATIVE RELEASE;
(4) THE NUMBER OF HEARINGS HELD AND THE PURPOSE OF EACH
HEARING; AND
(5) THE NUMBER OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
PAROLE–ELIGIBLE BUT HAVE NOT BEEN GRANTED PAROLE.
7–303.
(a) Before any hearing on parole release, the Commission shall give the
incarcerated individual:

HOUSE BILL 1147 3
(1) adequate and timely written notice of:
[(1)] (I) the date, time, and place of the hearing; and
[(2)] (II) the factors that the Commission or hearing examiner will
consider in determining whether the incarcerated individual is suitable for parole[.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
notice also shall indicate that, before the hearing, the incarcerated individual or the
incarcerated individual’s representative may, on request, examine any document]; AND
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
COPIES OF ALL DOCUMENTS that the Commission or hearing examiner will use in
determining whether the incarcerated individual is suitable for parole.
[(ii)] (B) (1) A document, or a portion of it, is not available for
examination[,] if the Commission determines that:
[1.] (I) the document or portion contains a diagnostic
opinion;
[2.] (II) the incarcerated individual’s knowledge of the
document or portion would disrupt seriously a program of rehabilitation;
[3.] (III) the document or portion contains sources of
information obtained on a promise of confidentiality; or
[4.] (IV) the document or portion is otherwise privileged.
[(iii)] (2) If the Commission determines that a document or a
portion of it is not available for examination, the Commission shall notify the incarcerated
individual that:
[1.] (I) the document or portion is not available for
examination; and
[2.] (II) on request and if appropriate, the Commission will
provide the incarcerated individual or the incarcerated individual’s representative with the
substance of any information contained in the document or portion.
[(2)] (C) The Commission shall delete the address and phone number of
the victim or the victim’s designated representative from a document before the
incarcerated individual or the incarcerated individual’s representative examines the
document.

HOUSE BILL 1147
7–304.
(b) The vote of each commissioner when acting collectively or in a panel, to
approve or deny parole, EACH COMMISSIONER’S REASONING AND JUSTIFICATIONS
FOR THE COMMISSIONER’S VOTE, and a vote to close or restrict access to a parole hearing
under subsection (d) of this section, shall be made available to the public.
7–305.
Each hearing examiner and commissioner determining whether an incarcerated
individual is suitable for parole, and the Commission before entering into a predetermined
parole release agreement, shall consider:
(7) ANY VICTIM’S ORIGINAL OR SUBSEQUENTLY FILED VICTIM
IMPACT STATEMENT, an updated victim impact statement, or ANY recommendation
prepared under § 7–801 of this title;
7–306.
(a) (1) The chairperson of the Commission shall assign hearing examiners, or
commissioners acting as hearing examiners, as required to hear cases for parole.
(2) Each proceeding before a hearing examiner shall be conducted in
accordance with this section.
(b) The Commission shall keep a record of each hearing conducted by a hearing
examiner.
(c) A hearing examiner shall determine if an incarcerated individual is suitable
for parole in accordance with the factors and other information specified in § 7–305 of this
subtitle.
(d) (1) At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing examiner shall inform the
incarcerated individual of the hearing examiner’s recommendation for parole or denial of
parole.
(2) Within [21] 7 14 days after the hearing, the hearing examiner shall
give to the Commission, the Commissioner of Correction, and the incarcerated individual a
written report of the hearing examiner’s findings and recommendation for parole or denial
of parole, INCLUDING THE REASONING AND JUSTIFICATIONS FOR THE
RECOMMENDATION.
(3) The Commissioner of Correction or the incarcerated individual may file
with the Commission written exceptions to the report of a hearing examiner no later than
5 days after the report is received.

HOUSE BILL 1147 5
(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, one commissioner assigned
by the chairperson of the Commission shall review summarily the recommendation of the
hearing examiner.
(2) (i) The Commission, on its own initiative or on the filing of an
exception, may schedule a hearing on the record by the entire Commission or by a panel of
at least two commissioners assigned by the chairperson of the Commission.
(ii) The Commission or panel shall render a written decision on the
appeal.
(iii) The decision of the Commission or panel is final.
(3) If an exception is not filed and the Commission does not act on its own
initiative within the 5–day appeal period established under subsection (d)(3) of this section,
the recommendation of the hearing examiner is approved.
(4) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMPTLY GIVE THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WRITTEN NOTICE OF ITS FINAL DECISION UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(II) IF THE COMMISSION’S FINAL DECISION UNDER THIS
SECTION IS TO DENY PAROLE, THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE THE DATE OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S
NEXT PAROLE HEARING, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–307.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–307.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the chairperson of
the Commission shall assign at least two commissioners to hear cases for parole release as
a panel.
(2) Each proceeding before a Commission panel shall be conducted in
accordance with this section.
(b) (1) (i) A Commission panel that consists of two commissioners shall
determine, by unanimous vote, whether the incarcerated individual is suitable for parole
in accordance with the factors and other information specified in § 7–305 of this subtitle.
(ii) If the two–commissioner panel is unable to reach a unanimous
decision, the chairperson of the Commission shall convene a three–commissioner panel as
soon as practicable to rehear the case.

HOUSE BILL 1147
(2) A Commission panel that consists of three commissioners shall
determine, by majority vote, whether the incarcerated individual is suitable for parole in
accordance with the factors and other information specified in § 7–305 of this subtitle.
(c) For an incarcerated individual who has been sentenced to life imprisonment
after being convicted of a crime committed on or after October 1, 2021, at least six
affirmative votes are required to approve the incarcerated individual for parole, based on
consideration of the factors specified in § 7–305 of this subtitle.
(d) (1) The Commission panel shall inform the incarcerated individual and the
appropriate correctional authority of the Commission’s decision as soon as possible.
(2) If parole is denied, the Commission shall, WITHIN 7 14 DAYS AFTER
THE HEARING, give the incarcerated individual:
(I) a written report of its findings [within 30 days after the hearing],
INCLUDING THE REASONING AND JUSTIFICATIONS FOR THE DECISION; AND
(II) WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE DATE OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S NEXT PAROLE HEARING, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–307.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
7–307.1.
(A) THE COMMISSION DOES NOT HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO PERMANENTLY
DENY PAROLE.
(B) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS ENTITLED TO A SUBSEQUENT
PAROLE HEARING:
(1) FOR AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SENTENCED TO A PERIOD OF
INCARCERATION OF 10 YEARS OR LESS, NOT LATER THAN 2 YEARS AFTER EACH
PAROLE HEARING THAT RESULTS IN A DENIAL OF PAROLE;
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FOR AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SENTENCED TO A PERIOD OF INCARCERATION
EXCEEDING 10 YEARS, NOT LATER THAN 3 YEARS AFTER EACH PAROLE HEARING
THAT RESULTS IN A DENIAL OF PAROLE; AND
(3) FOR AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL SENTENCED TO A PERIOD OF
INCARCERATION EXCEEDING 20 YEARS FOR A CRIME AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL, NOT
LATER THAN 3 YEARS AFTER THE FIRST PAROLE HEARING THAT RESULTS IN A
DENIAL OF PAROLE AND NOT LATER THAN 5 YEARS THEREAFTER.

HOUSE BILL 1147 7
7–307.2.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL RECORD EACH HEARING AND TRANSCRIBE
THE RECORDING OF THE HEARING WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE CONCLUSION OF THE
HEARING.
(B) EACH HEARING TRANSCRIPT RECORDING SHALL BE:
(1) FILED AND MAINTAINED IN THE OFFICE OF THE COMMISSION
REDACTED OF ALL PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION OF THE VICTIM; AND
(2) MADE READILY AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL.
(C) ALL VICTIM NAMES SHALL BE REDACTED FROM A HEARING
TRANSCRIPT.
(D) EACH HEARING RECORDING AND TRANSCRIPT SHALL BE RETAINED
ELECTRONICALLY UNTIL 3 YEARS AFTER THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS
RELEASED FROM INCARCERATION, ALL POSTINCARCERATION SUPERVISION IS
COMPLETED, AND ALL APPEALS ARE EXHAUSTED, WHICHEVER HAPPENS LAST.
(E) (D) AT THE CONCLUSION OF EACH HEARING, THE PRESIDING
COMMISSIONER SHALL STATE THE FINDINGS, REASONING, AND JUSTIFICATIONS OF
THE COMMISSION ON THE RECORD.
(F) (E) ANY STATEMENTS, RECOMMENDATIONS, AND OTHER MATERIALS
CONSIDERED BY THE COMMISSION SHALL BE INCORPORATED INTO THE
TRANSCRIPT RECORDING OF THE HEARING, UNLESS CONFIDENTIALITY IS
NECESSARY TO PRESERVE INSTITUTIONAL SECURITY OR THE SECURITY OF
PERSONS WHO MIGHT BE ENDANGERED BY DISCLOSURE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.